Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.115.050

Planning committee—Criteria for selecting participants.

The office shall establish a planning committee to assist it in developing criteria for the selection of participants for the Washington health corps program. The office shall include on the planning committee representatives of the department, the department of social and health services, appropriate representatives from health care facilities, provider groups, consumers, the state board for community and technical colleges, the superintendent of public instruction, institutions of higher education, representatives from the behavioral health and public health fields, the council, and other appropriate public and private agencies and organizations. The criteria may require that some of the participants meet the definition of financial need under RCW 28B.92.030.

[ 2023 c 442 s 5; 2022 c 276 s 3; 2019 c 302 s 5; 2011 1st sp.s. c 11 s 206; 2004 c 275 s 70; 1991 c 332 s 18; 1989 1st ex.s. c 9 s 719. Formerly RCW 18.150.040.]

NOTES:

Intent—2023 c 442: See note following RCW 28B.115.020.

Effective date—2011 1st sp.s. c 11 ss 101-103, 106-202, 204-244, and 301: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Intent—2011 1st sp.s. c 11: See note following RCW 28B.76.020.

Part headings not law—2004 c 275: See note following RCW 28B.76.090.